Missouri, session 2026, HB3007.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 337.021, 337.025, 337.050, 337.510, 337.615, 337.618, 337.715,
and 337.718, RSMo, are repealed and eight new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known
as sections 337.021, 337.025, 337.050, 337.510, 337.615, 337.618, 337.715, and 337.718, to
read as follows:
337.021. 1. The provisions of this section shall govern, except as provided in
subsection 3 of this section, the education and experience requirements for initial licensure as
a psychologist for the following persons:
(1) A person who has completed a graduate program which is primarily psychological
in nature prior to August 28, 1990; or
(2) A person who is matriculated in a graduate program which is primarily
psychological in nature prior to August 28, 1990; provided that, such person who does not
complete all requirements for initial licensure prior to August 28, 1996, except as provided in
subsections 5 and 6 of this section, shall be governed by the licensure requirements of section
337.025.
2. Each applicant shall submit evidence satisfactory to the committee that:
(1) The applicant either:
[(1)] (a) Has received a doctoral degree, based upon a program of studies from a
recognized educational institution the contents of which were primarily psychological, as
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3007 2
defined by rule, and who has had at least one year of satisfactory supervised professional
experience in the general field of psychology, as defined by rule; or
[(2)] (b) Received a master's degree, based upon a program of studies from a
recognized educational institution the contents of which were primarily psychological, as
defined by rule, and who has had at least three years of satisfactory professional experience in
the general field of psychology, as defined by rule; and
(2) The applicant has completed three semester credit hours of graduate-level
courses related to domestic violence.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, an applicant who
has received a doctoral degree from a graduate program which is primarily psychological in
nature prior to August 28, 1990, may elect at the applicant's option to have the applicant's
application and licensure evaluated pursuant to the provisions of either section 337.021 or
337.025.
4. The rules referred to in subsection 2 of this section shall be those rules as
previously promulgated by the department pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.020 and
337.050 as were in force and effect on August 28, 1989.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of section 337.025 or this section to the contrary,
any person who qualifies for initial licensure pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision [(2)]
(1) of subsection 2 of this section that has taken the Missouri licensing examination but has
not received a passing score on the licensing examination before August 28, 1996, shall be
allowed the same amount of attempts, within the same allotted time, to pass such examination
as a person who meets the requirements for initial licensure pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section.
6. As used in sections 337.010 to 337.090, initial licensure refers only to the
educational and experience requirements set forth in subsection 2 of this section, such that
initial licensure shall not include passage of any examination given for the purposes of full
licensure under section 337.020.
337.025. 1. The provisions of this section shall govern the education and experience
requirements for initial licensure as a psychologist for the following persons:
(1) A person who has not matriculated in a graduate degree program which is
primarily psychological in nature on or before August 28, 1990; and
(2) A person who is matriculated after August 28, 1990, in a graduate degree program
designed to train professional psychologists.
2. Each applicant shall submit satisfactory evidence to the committee that the
applicant has received a doctoral degree in psychology from a recognized educational
institution, has completed three semester credit hours of graduate-level courses related to

HB 3007 3
domestic violence, and has had at least one year of satisfactory supervised professional
experience in the field of psychology.
3. A doctoral degree in psychology is defined as:
(1) A program accredited, or provisionally accredited, by the American Psychological
Association (APA), the Canadian Psychological Association (CPA), or the Psychological
Clinical Science Accreditation System (PCSAS); provided that, such program includes a
supervised practicum, internship, field, or laboratory training appropriate to the practice of
psychology; or
(2) A program designated or approved, including provisional approval, by the
Association of State and Provincial Psychology Boards or the Council for the National
Register of Health Service Providers in Psychology, or both; or
(3) A graduate program that meets all of the following criteria:
(a) The program, wherever it may be administratively housed, shall be clearly
identified and labeled as a psychology program. Such a program shall specify in pertinent
institutional catalogues and brochures its intent to educate and train professional
psychologists;
(b) The psychology program shall stand as a recognizable, coherent organizational
entity within the institution of higher education;
(c) There shall be a clear authority and primary responsibility for the core and
specialty areas whether or not the program cuts across administrative lines;
(d) The program shall be an integrated, organized, sequence of study;
(e) There shall be an identifiable psychology faculty and a psychologist responsible
for the program;
(f) The program shall have an identifiable body of students who are matriculated in
that program for a degree;
(g) The program shall include a supervised practicum, internship, field, or laboratory
training appropriate to the practice of psychology;
(h) The curriculum shall encompass a minimum of three academic years of full-time
graduate study, with a minimum of one year's residency at the educational institution granting
the doctoral degree; and
(i) Require the completion by the applicant of a core program in psychology which
shall be met by the completion and award of at least one three-semester-hour graduate credit
course or a combination of graduate credit courses totaling three semester hours or five
quarter hours in each of the following areas:
a. The biological bases of behavior such as courses in: physiological psychology,
comparative psychology, neuropsychology, sensation and perception, psychopharmacology;

HB 3007 4
b. The cognitive-affective bases of behavior such as courses in: learning, thinking,
motivation, emotion, and cognitive psychology;
c. The social bases of behavior such as courses in: social psychology, group
processes/dynamics, interpersonal relationships, and organizational and systems theory;
d. Individual differences such as courses in: personality theory, human development,
abnormal psychology, developmental psychology, child psychology, adolescent psychology,
psychology of aging, and theories of personality;
e. The scientific methods and procedures of understanding, predicting and influencing
human behavior such as courses in: statistics, experimental design, psychometrics, individual
testing, group testing, and research design and methodology.
4. Acceptable supervised professional experience may be accrued through
preinternship, internship, predoctoral postinternship, or postdoctoral experiences. The
academic training director or the postdoctoral training supervisor shall attest to the hours
accrued to meet the requirements of this section. Such hours shall consist of:
(1) A minimum of fifteen hundred hours of experience in a successfully completed
internship to be completed in not less than twelve nor more than twenty-four months; and
(2) A minimum of two thousand hours of experience consisting of any combination
of the following:
(a) Preinternship and predoctoral postinternship professional experience that occurs
following the completion of the first year of the doctoral program or at any time while in a
doctoral program after completion of a master's degree in psychology or equivalent as defined
by rule by the committee;
(b) Up to seven hundred fifty hours obtained while on the internship under
subdivision (1) of this subsection but beyond the fifteen hundred hours identified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection; or
(c) Postdoctoral professional experience obtained in no more than twenty-four
consecutive calendar months. In no case shall this experience be accumulated at a rate of
more than fifty hours per week. Postdoctoral supervised professional experience for
prospective health service providers and other applicants shall involve and relate to the
delivery of psychological services in accordance with professional requirements and relevant
to the applicant's intended area of practice.
5. Experience for those applicants who intend to seek health service provider
certification and who have completed a program in one or more of the American
Psychological Association designated health service provider delivery areas shall be obtained
under the primary supervision of a licensed psychologist who is also a health service provider
or who otherwise meets the requirements for health service provider certification. Experience
for those applicants who do not intend to seek health service provider certification shall be

HB 3007 5
obtained under the primary supervision of a licensed psychologist or such other qualified
mental health professional approved by the committee.
6. For postinternship and postdoctoral hours, the psychological activities of the
applicant shall be performed pursuant to the primary supervisor's order, control, and full
professional responsibility. The primary supervisor shall maintain a continuing relationship
with the applicant and shall meet with the applicant a minimum of one hour per month in
face-to-face individual supervision. Clinical supervision may be delegated by the primary
supervisor to one or more secondary supervisors who are qualified psychologists. The
secondary supervisors shall retain order, control, and full professional responsibility for the
applicant's clinical work under their supervision and shall meet with the applicant a minimum
of one hour per week in face-to-face individual supervision. If the primary supervisor is also
the clinical supervisor, meetings shall be a minimum of one hour per week. Group
supervision shall not be acceptable for supervised professional experience. The primary
supervisor shall certify to the committee that the applicant has complied with these
requirements and that the applicant has demonstrated ethical and competent practice of
psychology. The changing by an agency of the primary supervisor during the course of the
supervised experience shall not invalidate the supervised experience.
100 7. The committee by rule shall provide procedures for exceptions and variances from
101 the requirements for once a week face-to-face supervision due to vacations, illness,
102 pregnancy, and other good causes.
337.050. 1. There is hereby created and established a "State Committee of
Psychologists", which shall consist of seven licensed psychologists and one public member.
The state committee of psychologists existing on August 28, 1989, is abolished. Nothing in
this section shall be construed to prevent the appointment of any current member of the state
committee of psychologists to the new state committee of psychologists created on August
28, 1989.
2. Appointments to the committee shall be made by the governor upon the
recommendations of the director of the division, upon the advice and consent of the senate.
The division, prior to submitting nominations, shall solicit nominees from professional
psychological associations and licensed psychologists in the state. The term of office for
committee members shall be five years, and committee members shall not serve more than
ten years. No person who has previously served on the committee for ten years shall be
eligible for appointment. In making initial appointments to the committee, the governor shall
stagger the terms of the appointees so that two members serve initial terms of two years, two
members serve initial terms of three years, and two members serve initial terms of four years.
3. Each committee member shall be a resident of the state of Missouri for one year,
shall be a United States citizen, and shall, other than the public member, have been licensed as

HB 3007 6
a psychologist in this state for at least three years. Committee members shall reflect a
diversity of practice specialties. To ensure adequate representation of the diverse fields of
psychology, the committee shall consist of at least two psychologists who are engaged full
time in the doctoral teaching and training of psychologists, and at least two psychologists who
are engaged full time in the professional practice of psychology. In addition, the first
appointment to the committee shall include at least one psychologist who shall be licensed on
the basis of a master's degree who shall serve a full term of five years. Nothing in sections
337.010 to 337.090 shall be construed to prohibit full membership rights on the committee for
psychologists licensed on the basis of a master's degree. If a member of the committee shall,
during the member's term as a committee member, remove the member's domicile from the
state of Missouri, then the committee shall immediately notify the director of the division, and
the seat of that committee member shall be declared vacant. All such vacancies shall be filled
by appointment of the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, and the member so
appointed shall serve for the unexpired term of the member whose seat has been declared
vacant.
4. The public member shall be at the time of the public member's appointment a
citizen of the United States; a resident of this state for a period of one year and a registered
voter; a person who is not and never was a member of any profession licensed or regulated
pursuant to sections 337.010 to 337.093 or the spouse of such person; and a person who does
not have and never has had a material, financial interest in either the providing of the
professional services regulated by sections 337.010 to 337.093, or an activity or organization
directly related to any profession licensed or regulated pursuant to sections 337.010 to
337.093. The duties of the public member shall not include the determination of the technical
requirements to be met for licensure or whether any person meets such technical requirements
or of the technical competence or technical judgment of a licensee or a candidate for
licensure.
5. The committee shall hold a regular annual meeting at which it shall select from
among its members a chairperson and a secretary. A quorum of the committee shall consist of
a majority of its members. In the absence of the chairperson, the secretary shall conduct the
office of the chairperson.
6. Each member of the committee shall receive, as compensation, an amount set by
the division not to exceed fifty dollars for each day devoted to the affairs of the committee
and shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary and actual expenses incurred in the
performance of the member's official duties.
7. Staff for the committee shall be provided by the director of the division of
professional registration.

HB 3007 7
8. The governor may remove any member of the committee for misconduct,
inefficiency, incompetency, or neglect of office.
9. In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in sections 337.010 to 337.090, the
division may adopt rules and regulations, not otherwise inconsistent with sections 337.010 to
337.090, to carry out the provisions of sections 337.010 to 337.090. The committee may
promulgate, by rule, "Ethical Rules of Conduct" governing the practices of psychology which
rules shall be based upon the ethical principles promulgated and published by the American
Psychological Association.
10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
promulgated to administer and enforce sections 337.010 to 337.090, shall become effective
only if the agency has fully complied with all of the requirements of chapter 536 including but
not limited to section 536.028 if applicable, after August 28, 1998. All rulemaking authority
delegated prior to August 28, 1998, is of no force and effect and repealed as of August 28,
1998, however nothing in this act shall be interpreted to repeal or affect the validity of any
rule adopted and promulgated prior to August 28, 1998. If the provisions of section 536.028
apply, the provisions of this section are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to section 536.028 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule or portion of a rule are held unconstitutional or invalid, the
purported grant of rulemaking authority and any rule so proposed and contained in the order
of rulemaking shall be invalid and void, except that nothing in this act shall affect the validity
of any rule adopted and promulgated prior to August 28, 1998.
11. The committee may sue and be sued in its official name, and shall have a seal
which shall be affixed to all certified copies or records and papers on file, and to such other
instruments as the committee may direct. All courts shall take judicial notice of such seal.
Copies of records and proceedings of the committee, and of all papers on file with the
division on behalf of the committee certified under the seal shall be received as evidence in all
courts of record.
12. When applying for a renewal of a license pursuant to section 337.030, each
licensed psychologist shall submit proof of the completion of at least forty hours of
continuing education credit within the two-year period immediately preceding the date of the
application for renewal of the license, with a minimum of three of the forty hours of
continuing education dedicated to professional ethics and a minimum of two of the forty
hours of continuing education dedicated to domestic violence. The type of continuing
education to be considered shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Attending recognized educational seminars, the content of which are primarily
psychological, as defined by rule;

HB 3007 8
(2) Attending a graduate level course at a recognized educational institution where
the contents of which are primarily psychological, as defined by rule;
(3) Presenting a recognized educational seminar, the contents of which are primarily
psychological, as defined by rule;
(4) Presenting a graduate level course at a recognized educational institution where
the contents of which are primarily psychological, as defined by rule; and
(5) Independent course of studies, the contents of which are primarily psychological,
which have been approved by the committee and defined by rule.

The committee shall determine by administrative rule the amount of training, instruction, self-
100 instruction or teaching that shall be counted as an hour of continuing education credit.
337.510. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "License", a license, certificate, registration, permit, accreditation, or military
occupational specialty that enables a person to legally practice an occupation or profession in
a particular jurisdiction;
(2) "Military", the Armed Forces of the United States, including the Air Force, Army,
Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, National Guard and any other military
branch that is designated by Congress as part of the Armed Forces of the United States, and
all reserve components and auxiliaries. Such term also includes the military reserves and
militia of any United States territory or state;
(3) "Nonresident military spouse", a nonresident spouse of an active duty member of
the Armed Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be
transferred to the state of Missouri, or who has been transferred or is scheduled to be
transferred to an adjacent state and is or will be domiciled in the state of Missouri, or has
moved to the state of Missouri on a permanent change-of-station basis;
(4) "Resident military spouse", a spouse of an active duty member of the Armed
Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to the
state of Missouri or an adjacent state and who is a permanent resident of the state of Missouri,
who is domiciled in the state of Missouri, or who has Missouri as his or her home of record.
2. Each applicant for licensure as a professional counselor shall furnish evidence to
the committee that the applicant is at least eighteen years of age, is a United States citizen or
is legally present in the United States; and
(1) The applicant has completed a course of study as defined by the board rule leading
to a master's, specialist's, or doctoral degree with a major in counseling, except any applicant
who has held a license as a professional counselor in this state or currently holds a license as a
professional counselor in another state shall not be required to have completed any courses
related to career development; [and]

HB 3007 9
(2) The applicant has completed acceptable supervised counseling as defined by
board rule. If the applicant has a master's degree with a major in counseling as defined by
board rule, the applicant shall complete at least two years of acceptable supervised counseling
experience subsequent to the receipt of the master's degree. The composition and number of
hours comprising the acceptable supervised counseling experience shall be defined by board
rule. An applicant may substitute thirty semester hours of post master's graduate study for
one of the two required years of acceptable supervised counseling experience if such hours
are clearly related to counseling;
(3) After August 28, 2007, each applicant shall have completed a minimum of three
hours of graduate level coursework in diagnostic systems either in the curriculum leading to a
degree or as post master's graduate level course work;
(4) The applicant has completed three semester credit hours of graduate-level
courses related to domestic violence; and
(5) Upon examination, the applicant is possessed of requisite knowledge of the
profession, including techniques and applications, research and its interpretation, and
professional affairs and ethics.
3. (1) Any person who holds a valid current professional counselor license issued by
another state, a branch or unit of the military, a territory of the United States, or the District of
Columbia, and who has been licensed for at least one year in such other jurisdiction, may
submit an application for a professional counselor license in Missouri along with proof of
current licensure and proof of licensure for at least one year in the other jurisdiction, to the
committee.
(2) The committee shall:
(a) Within six months of receiving an application described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in
this state for the applicant if it determines that there were minimum education requirements
and, if applicable, work experience and clinical supervision requirements in effect and the
other state and jurisdiction verifies that the person met those requirements in order to be
licensed or certified in that state and jurisdiction. The committee may require an applicant to
take and pass an examination specific to the laws of this state; or
(b) Within thirty days of receiving an application described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection from a nonresident military spouse or a resident military spouse, waive any
examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in this state for the
applicant and issue such applicant a license under this subsection if such applicant otherwise
meets the requirements of this subsection [and section].
(3) (a) The committee shall not waive any examination, educational, or experience
requirements for any applicant who has had his or her license revoked by a committee outside

HB 3007 10
the state; who is currently under investigation, who has a complaint pending, or who is
currently under disciplinary action, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subdivision,
with a committee outside the state; who does not hold a license in good standing with a
committee outside the state; who has a criminal record that would disqualify him or her for
licensure in Missouri; or who does not hold a valid current license in the other jurisdiction on
the date the committee receives his or her application under this subsection [and section].
(b) If another jurisdiction has taken disciplinary action against an applicant, the
committee shall determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter resolved.
If the matter has not been resolved by that jurisdiction, the committee may deny a license
until the matter is resolved.
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the committee from denying a license to
an applicant under this subsection for any reason described in section 337.525.
(5) Any person who is licensed under the provisions of this subsection shall be
subject to the committee's jurisdiction and all rules and regulations pertaining to the practice
as a licensed professional counselor in this state.
(6) This subsection shall not be construed to waive any requirement for an applicant
to pay any fees.
4. The committee shall issue a license to each person who files an application and fee
and who furnishes evidence satisfactory to the committee that the applicant has complied with
the provisions of this act and has taken and passed a written, open-book examination on
Missouri laws and regulations governing the practice of professional counseling as defined in
section 337.500. The division shall issue a provisional professional counselor license to any
applicant who meets all requirements of this section, but who has not completed the required
acceptable supervised counseling experience and such applicant may reapply for licensure as
a professional counselor upon completion of such acceptable supervised counseling
experience.
5. All persons licensed to practice professional counseling in this state shall pay on or
before the license renewal date a renewal license fee and shall furnish to the committee
satisfactory evidence of the completion of the requisite number of hours of continuing
education as required by rule, including two hours of suicide assessment, referral, treatment,
and management training and two hours of education on domestic violence, which shall be
no more than forty hours biennially. The continuing education requirements may be waived
by the committee upon presentation to the committee of satisfactory evidence of the illness of
the licensee or for other good cause.
337.615. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:

HB 3007 11
(1) "License", a license, certificate, registration, permit, accreditation, or military
occupational specialty that enables a person to legally practice an occupation or profession in
a particular jurisdiction;
(2) "Military", the Armed Forces of the United States, including the Air Force, Army,
Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, National Guard, and any other military
branch that is designated by Congress as part of the Armed Forces of the United States, and
all reserve components and auxiliaries. The term military also includes the military reserves
and militia of any United States territory or state;
(3) "Nonresident military spouse", a nonresident spouse of an active-duty member of
the Armed Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be
transferred to the state of Missouri, or who has been transferred or is scheduled to be
transferred to an adjacent state and is or will be domiciled in the state of Missouri, or has
moved to the state of Missouri on a permanent change-of-station basis;
(4) "Oversight body", any board, department, agency, or office of a jurisdiction that
issues licenses;
(5) "Resident military spouse", a spouse of an active-duty member of the Armed
Forces of the United States who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to the
state of Missouri or an adjacent state and who is a permanent resident of the state of Missouri,
who is domiciled in the state of Missouri, or who has Missouri as his or her home of record.
2. Each applicant for licensure as a clinical social worker shall furnish evidence to the
committee that:
(1) The applicant has:
(a) A master's degree from a college or university program of social work:
a. Accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; or
b. Recognized and approved by the committee in accordance with rules adopted by
the committee under section 337.627 and in accordance with the procedure set forth in section
337.628; or
(b) A doctorate degree from a school of social work acceptable to the committee;
(2) The applicant has completed three semester credit hours of graduate-level
courses related to domestic violence;
(3) The applicant has completed at least three thousand hours of supervised clinical
experience with a qualified clinical supervisor, as defined in section 337.600, in no less than
twenty-four months and no more than forty-eight consecutive calendar months. For any
applicant who has successfully completed at least four thousand hours of supervised clinical
experience with a qualified clinical supervisor, as defined in section 337.600, within the same
time frame prescribed in this subsection, the applicant shall be eligible for application of

HB 3007 12
licensure at three thousand hours and shall be furnished a certificate by the state committee
for social workers acknowledging the completion of said additional hours;
[(3)] (4) The applicant has achieved a passing score, as defined by the committee, on
an examination approved by the committee. The eligibility requirements for such
examination shall be promulgated by rule of the committee; and
[(4)] (5) The applicant is at least eighteen years of age, is a United States citizen or
has status as a legal resident alien, and has not been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or
entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal prosecution under the laws of any
state, of the United States, or of any country, for any offense directly related to the duties and
responsibilities of the occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not
sentence has been imposed.
3. (1) Any person who holds a valid current clinical social work license issued by
another state, a branch or unit of the military, a territory of the United States, or the District of
Columbia, and who has been licensed for at least one year in such other jurisdiction, may
submit to the committee an application for a clinical social work license in Missouri along
with proof of current licensure and proof of licensure for at least one year in the other
jurisdiction.
(2) The committee shall:
(a) Within six months of receiving an application described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, waive any examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in
this state for the applicant if it determines that there were minimum education requirements
and, if applicable, work experience and clinical supervision requirements in effect and the
other jurisdiction verifies that the person met those requirements in order to be licensed or
certified in that jurisdiction. The committee may require an applicant to take and pass an
examination specific to the laws of this state; or
(b) Within thirty days of receiving an application described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection from a nonresident military spouse or a resident military spouse, waive any
examination, educational, or experience requirements for licensure in this state for the
applicant and issue such applicant a license under this subsection if such applicant otherwise
meets the requirements of this subsection.
(3) (a) The committee shall not waive any examination, educational, or experience
requirements for any applicant who has had his or her license revoked by an oversight body
outside the state; who is currently under investigation, who has a complaint pending, or who
is currently under disciplinary action, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subdivision,
with an oversight body outside the state; who does not hold a license in good standing with an
oversight body outside the state; who has a criminal record that would disqualify him or her

HB 3007 13
for licensure in Missouri; or who does not hold a valid current license in the other jurisdiction
on the date the committee receives his or her application under this subsection.
(b) If another jurisdiction has taken disciplinary action against an applicant, the
committee shall determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter resolved.
If the matter has not been resolved by that jurisdiction, the committee may deny a license
until the matter is resolved.
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the committee from denying a license to
an applicant under this subsection for any reason described in section 337.630.
(5) Any person who is licensed under the provisions of this subsection shall be
subject to the committee's jurisdiction and all rules and regulations pertaining to the practice
as a licensed clinical social worker in this state.
(6) This subsection shall not be construed to waive any requirement for an applicant
to pay any fees.
4. The committee shall issue a license to each person who files an application and fee
as required by the provisions of sections 337.600 to 337.689 and who furnishes evidence
satisfactory to the committee that the applicant has complied with the provisions of
subdivisions (1) to [(4)] (5) of subsection 2 of this section.
337.618. Each license issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to
337.689 shall expire on a renewal date established by the director. The term of licensure shall
be twenty-four months. The committee shall require a minimum number of thirty clock hours
of continuing education for renewal of a license issued pursuant to sections 337.600 to
337.689, including two hours of suicide assessment, referral, treatment, and management
training and, for clinical social workers, two hours of education on domestic violence.
The committee shall renew any license upon application for a renewal, completion of the
required continuing education hours and upon payment of the fee established by the
committee pursuant to the provisions of section 337.612. As provided by rule, the board may
waive or extend the time requirements for completion of continuing education for reasons
related to health, military service, foreign residency, or for other good cause. All requests for
waivers or extensions of time shall be made in writing and submitted to the board before the
renewal date.
337.715. 1. Each applicant for licensure or provisional licensure as a marital and
family therapist shall furnish evidence to the committee that:
(1) The applicant has a master's degree or a doctoral degree in marital and family
therapy from a program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and
Family Therapy Education, or its equivalent as defined by committee regulation, from an
educational institution accredited by a regional accrediting body that is recognized by the
United States Department of Education;

HB 3007 14
(2) The applicant for licensure as a marital and family therapist has twenty-four
months of postgraduate supervised clinical experience acceptable to the committee, as the
state committee determines by rule;
(3) After August 28, 2008, the applicant shall have completed a minimum of three
semester hours of graduate-level course work in diagnostic systems either within the
curriculum leading to a degree as defined in subdivision (1) of this subsection or as post-
master's graduate-level course work. Each applicant shall demonstrate supervision of
diagnosis as a core component of the postgraduate supervised clinical experience as defined
in subdivision (2) of this subsection;
(4) The applicant has completed three semester credit hours of graduate-level
courses related to domestic violence;
(5) Upon examination, the applicant is possessed of requisite knowledge of the
profession, including techniques and applications research and its interpretation and
professional affairs and ethics; and
[(5)] (6) The applicant is at least eighteen years of age, is a United States citizen or
has status as a legal resident alien, and has not been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or
entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal prosecution under the laws of any
state, of the United States, or of any country, for any offense directly related to the duties and
responsibilities of the occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not
sentence is imposed.
2. Any person otherwise qualified for licensure holding a current license, certificate
of registration, or permit from another state or territory of the United States or the District of
Columbia to practice marriage and family therapy may be granted a license without
examination to engage in the practice of marital and family therapy in this state upon
application to the state committee, payment of the required fee as established by the state
committee, and satisfaction of the following:
(1) Determination by the state committee that the requirements of the other state or
territory are substantially the same as Missouri;
(2) Verification by the applicant's licensing entity that the applicant has a current
license; and
(3) Consent by the applicant to examination of any disciplinary history in any state.
3. The state committee shall issue a license to each person who files an application
and fee as required by the provisions of sections 337.700 to 337.739.
337.718. 1. Each license issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.700 to
337.739 shall expire on a renewal date established by the director. The term of licensure shall
be twenty-four months; however, the director may establish a shorter term for the first
licenses issued pursuant to sections 337.700 to 337.739. The division shall renew any license

HB 3007 15
upon application for a renewal and upon payment of the fee established by the division
pursuant to the provisions of section 337.712. Effective August 28, 2008, as a prerequisite for
renewal, each licensed marital and family therapist shall furnish to the committee satisfactory
evidence of the completion of the requisite number of hours of continuing education as
defined by rule, which shall be no more than forty contact hours biennially. At least two
hours of continuing education shall be in suicide assessment, referral, treatment, and
management training, and at least two hours of continuing education shall be related to
domestic violence. The continuing education requirements may be waived by the committee
upon presentation to the committee of satisfactory evidence of illness or for other good cause.
2. The committee may issue temporary permits to practice under extenuating
circumstances as determined by the committee and defined by rule.
✔